District of Columbia statutes.
7-741.04

Penalties.

An employer or person who willfully violates the requirements of this chapter by:

(1)

Smoking in a prohibited area shall be subject to a fine of not less than $100 or more than $1,000; subsequent offenses shall be subject to a fine of not less than $200 or more than $1,000;

(2)

Obscuring, removing, defacing, mutilating or destroying any sign posted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall be subject to a fine of $500; or

(3)

Failing to post or maintain warning signs describing the prohibited activity and failing to notify a person observed to be smoking to stop the activity, as required by this subsection, shall be subject to a fine of $500; each day that a violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.

History

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4918
as added Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-90, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1087

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 7-744.